Washington statutes.
RCW 34.12.034

Retail internet service adequacy proceedings.

When requested by the public utility district commissioners, the chief administrative law judge shall assign an administrative law judge to conduct proceedings under *RCW 54.16.420.

[ 2018 c 186 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 54.16.420 was repealed by 2021 c 294 s 13.